Wyoming, session 2025, HB0201.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 9-4-722 is created to read:

9-4-722. Investment of state funds in Bitcoin.

(a) As used in this section:

HB0201

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0488
(i) "Bitcoin" means the decentralized digital
currency launched in 2009, based on Satoshi Nakamoto's
paper titled Bitcoin: A Peer-to-Peer Electronic Cash
System. "Bitcoin" also includes the digital asset that is
the basis of the Bitcoin exchange-traded product that is
regulated by the United States securities and exchange
commission;

(ii) "Exchange-traded product" means any
financial instrument that:

(A) Is approved by the United States
securities and exchange commission, the federal commodity
futures trading commission or the division of banking;

(B) Is traded on an exchange regulated
under state or federal law; and

(C) Derives its value from an underlying
pool of assets, including stocks, bonds, commodities or
indexes.

HB0201

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0488
(iii) "Private key" means as defined by W.S.
34-29-101(a)(v);

(iv) "Qualified custodian" means any special
purpose depository institution, a state chartered trust
company or a company regulated under state or federal law
that custodies digital assets for an approved
exchange-traded product;

(v) "Secure custody solution" means a
technological product or blended product or service that
has all of the following:

(A) The cryptographic private keys that
secure digital assets are:

(I) Exclusively known and accessible
by the state treasurer;

(II) Exclusively contained within an
encrypted environment and accessible only through
end-to-end encrypted channels;

HB0201

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0488
(III) Never contained by, accessible
by or controllable with a mobile or cellular phone.

(B) Any hardware that contains the
cryptographic private keys that secure digital assets is
maintained in at least two (2) geographically diversified
and specially designated secure data centers;

(C) A multi-party governance structure is
enforced for authorizing transactions and for user access
and all user-initiated actions are logged;

(D) The implementation of a disaster
recovery protocol that ensures customer access to assets if
the provider becomes unavailable;

(E) The completion of regular code audits
and penetration testing from audit firms and the
remediation of any identified vulnerabilities.

(b) The state treasurer may invest the following
funds in Bitcoin:

HB0201

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0488
(i) The general fund, provided that no more than
three percent (3%) of the general fund shall be invested in
Bitcoin at any one (1) time;

(ii) The permanent Wyoming mineral trust fund,
subject to subsection (c) of this section;

(iii) The permanent land fund, subject to
subsection (c) of this section.

(c) The state treasurer may invest the permanent
Wyoming mineral trust fund and the permanent land fund in
Bitcoin, provided that investments under this subsection
shall not exceed three percent (3%) of each fund.

(d) The state treasurer shall acquire and hold
Bitcoin invested under this section using one (1) or more
of the following methods:

(i) Directly by the state treasurer through the
use of a secure custody solution;

(ii) Through a qualified custodian;
HB0201

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0488

(iii) Through ownership or holding of an
exchange-traded product issued by an investment company or
manager registered under the federal Investment Advisor's
Act of 1940, as amended.

(e) If at any time the total market value of
investments in Bitcoin under this section exceeds the
percentage limits established in subsections (b) and (c) of
this section due to market appreciation, the state
treasurer shall not be required to sell or otherwise reduce
the investments to comply with the limits of this section.
The state treasurer shall not make any additional deposits
or investments in Bitcoin until the percentage of Bitcoin
holdings is within the limits specified in this section.
If the value of investments under this section are at or
fall below the limits specified in this section, the state
treasurer may resume the investment of funds in Bitcoin in
accordance with this section.

(f) The state treasurer shall promulgate all rules
necessary to implement this act.

HB0201

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0488
(g) Not later than October 1 of each year, the state
treasurer shall report to the joint appropriations
committee and the select committee on capital financing and
investments on:

(i) The amount and performance of investments in
Bitcoin under this section;

(ii) The custody and security arrangements taken
for investments made under this section, including actions
taken to comply with secure custody requirements;

(iii) The cost basis and current market value of
the Bitcoin held under this section;

(iv) The amount of payments received by the
state in Bitcoin and the amounts of Bitcoin converted and
reimbursed under this section.

Section 2. W.S. 9-4-714(a)(viii) is amended to read:

9-4-714. Definitions.

HB0201

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0488
(a) As used in this act:

(viii) "This act" means W.S. 9-4-714 through
9-4-721 9-4-722.

Section 3. The state treasurer shall promulgate all
rules necessary to implement this act.

Section 4. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
HB0201